Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
23-1528
Printed form; noncompliance; effect.

Any printed form accepted
for recordation that does not comply with sections 23-1503 to 23-1527 shall
not affect the validity of or the notice otherwise given by the recording.

Laws 2011, LB254, § 2.